Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.410

Governor's proclamation calling convention—When.

Within thirty days after the state is officially notified that the Congress of the United States has submitted to the several states a proposed amendment to the Constitution of the United States to be ratified or rejected by a convention, the governor shall issue a proclamation fixing the time and place for holding the convention and fixing the time for holding an election to elect delegates to the convention.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1430; 1965 c 9 s 29.74.010. Prior: 1933 c 181 s 1, part; RRS s 5249-1, part. Formerly RCW 29.74.010.]